Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1312
Registered environmental health specialist; reciprocity; continuing competency requirements; military spouse; temporary certification.

(1) An applicant for certification as a registered environmental health specialist who has met the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126 for certification based on a credential in another jurisdiction but is not practicing at the time of application for certification shall present proof satisfactory to the department that he or she has within the three years immediately preceding the application for certification completed continuing competency requirements approved by the board pursuant to section 38-145.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for temporary certification as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 533;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 50.